Ohio, session 136, HB14.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Ohio:
S 1. That section 5701.11 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows:
ECTION
Sec. 5701.11. The effective date to which this section refers is the effective date of this
section as amended by S.B. 10 H.B. 14 of the 135th 136th general assembly.
(A)(1) Except as provided under division (A)(2) or (B) of this section, any reference in Title
LVII or section 149.311, 3123.90, 3770.073, or 3772.37 of the Revised Code to the Internal
Revenue Code, to the Internal Revenue Code "as amended," to other laws of the United States, or to
other laws of the United States, "as amended," means the Internal Revenue Code or other laws of the
United States as they exist on the effective date.
(2) This section does not apply to any reference in Title LVII of the Revised Code to the
Internal Revenue Code as of a date certain specifying the day, month, and year, or to other laws of
the United States as of a date certain specifying the day, month, and year.
(B)(1) For purposes of applying section 5733.04, 5745.01, or 5747.01 of the Revised Code
to a taxpayer's taxable year ending after February 17, 2022March 15, 2023, and before the effective
date, a taxpayer may irrevocably elect to incorporate the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code or
other laws of the United States that are in effect for federal income tax purposes for that taxable year
if those provisions differ from the provisions that, under division (A) of this section, would
otherwise apply. The filing by the taxpayer for that taxable year of a report or return that
incorporates the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code or other laws of the United States
applicable for federal income tax purposes for that taxable year, and that does not include any
adjustments to reverse the effects of any differences between those provisions and the provisions
that would otherwise apply, constitutes the making of an irrevocable election under this division for
that taxable year.
(2) Elections under prior versions of division (B)(1) of this section remain in effect for the
taxable years to which they apply.
S 2. That existing section 5701.11 of the Revised Code is hereby repealed.
ECTION

Am. H. B. No. 14 136th G.A.
2
S 3. This act is hereby declared to be an emergency measure necessary for the
ECTION
immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety. The reason for such necessity is to
enable taxpayers to avoid making miscellaneous adjustments on their 2024 tax returns that increase
costs of compliance. Therefore, this act shall go into immediate effect.

Am. H. B. No. 14 136th G.A.
Speaker ___________________ of the House of Representatives.
President ___________________ of the Senate.
Passed ________________________, 20____
Approved ________________________, 20____
Governor.

Am. H. B. No. 14 136th G.A.
The section numbering of law of a general and permanent nature is
complete and in conformity with the Revised Code.
Director, Legislative Service Commission.
Filed in the office of the Secretary of State at Columbus, Ohio, on the ____
day of ___________, A. D. 20____.
Secretary of State.
File No. _________ Effective Date ___________________